Illinois, session 104th, SB1373.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The University of Illinois Act is amended by 5adding Section 195 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 305/195 new)7    Sec. 195. Academic advisors or counselors. The Board of 8Trustees shall ensure that an academic advisor or counselor 9acts with a duty of care or fiduciary duty to provide academic 10guidance and advice that is strictly in the best interest of 11the student whom he or she advises or counsels. 12    Section 10. The Southern Illinois University Management 13Act is amended by adding Section 165 as follows: 14    (110 ILCS 520/165 new)15    Sec. 165. Academic advisors or counselors. The Board shall 16ensure that an academic advisor or counselor acts with a duty 17of care or fiduciary duty to provide academic guidance and 18advice that is strictly in the best interest of the student 19whom he or she advises or counsels. 20    Section 15. The Chicago State University Law is amended by   SB1373- 2 -LRB104 03570 LNS 13594 b1adding Section 5-275 as follows: 2    (110 ILCS 660/5-275 new)3    Sec. 5-275. Academic advisors or counselors. The Board 4shall ensure that an academic advisor or counselor acts with a 5duty of care or fiduciary duty to provide academic guidance 6and advice that is strictly in the best interest of the student 7whom he or she advises or counsels. 8    Section 20. The Eastern Illinois University Law is amended 9by adding Section 10-280 as follows: 10    (110 ILCS 665/10-280 new)11    Sec. 10-280. Academic advisors or counselors. The Board 12shall ensure that an academic advisor or counselor acts with a 13duty of care or fiduciary duty to provide academic guidance 14and advice that is strictly in the best interest of the student 15whom he or she advises or counsels. 16    Section 25. The Governors State University Law is amended 17by adding Section 15-275 as follows: 18    (110 ILCS 670/15-275 new)19    Sec. 15-275. Academic advisors or counselors. The Board 20shall ensure that an academic advisor or counselor acts with a 21duty of care or fiduciary duty to provide academic guidance   SB1373- 3 -LRB104 03570 LNS 13594 b1and advice that is strictly in the best interest of the student 2whom he or she advises or counsels. 3    Section 30. The Illinois State University Law is amended 4by adding Section 20-285 as follows: 5    (110 ILCS 675/20-285 new)6    Sec. 20-285. Academic advisors or counselors. The Board 7shall ensure that an academic advisor or counselor acts with a 8duty of care or fiduciary duty to provide academic guidance 9and advice that is strictly in the best interest of the student 10whom he or she advises or counsels. 11    Section 35. The Northeastern Illinois University Law is 12amended by adding Section 25-280 as follows: 13    (110 ILCS 680/25-280 new)14    Sec. 25-280. Academic advisors or counselors. The Board 15shall ensure that an academic advisor or counselor acts with a 16duty of care or fiduciary duty to provide academic guidance 17and advice that is strictly in the best interest of the student 18whom he or she advises or counsels. 19    Section 40. The Northern Illinois University Law is 20amended by adding Section 30-290 as follows:   SB1373- 4 -LRB104 03570 LNS 13594 b1    (110 ILCS 685/30-290 new)2    Sec. 30-290. Academic advisors or counselors. The Board 3shall ensure that an academic advisor or counselor acts with a 4duty of care or fiduciary duty to provide academic guidance 5and advice that is strictly in the best interest of the student 6whom he or she advises or counsels. 7    Section 45. The Western Illinois University Law is amended 8by adding Section 35-285 as follows: 9    (110 ILCS 690/35-285 new)10    Sec. 35-285. Academic advisors or counselors. The Board 11shall ensure that an academic advisor or counselor acts with a 12duty of care or fiduciary duty to provide academic guidance 13and advice that is strictly in the best interest of the student 14whom he or she advises or counsels.